Colorado, session 2026A, HB1422.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 2-2-329 as
follows:
2-2-329. Administrator of legislative safety - definitions - repeal.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "COVERED INDIVIDUAL" MEANS A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, AN EMPLOYEE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, OR ANY OTHER
INDIVIDUAL DESIGNATED AS A "COVERED INDIVIDUAL" BY THE EXECUTIVE
COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) "STATE CAPITOL BUILDINGS COMPLEX" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 24-82-105 (1)(a).
(2) (a) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
MAY, SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE APPROPRIATIONS, APPOINT AN ADMINISTRATOR
OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY TO SERVE AS THE PRIMARY POINT OF CONTACT FOR
COVERED INDIVIDUALS ON ALL MATTERS RELATING TO THEIR PERSONAL
SAFETY AND SECURITY AND TO COORDINATE SECURITY AND PROTECTION FOR
COVERED INDIVIDUALS WITH THE COLORADO STATE PATROL. THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY IS PAID A SALARY DETERMINED BY
THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE. THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY
SHALL BE APPOINTED WITHOUT REFERENCE TO AFFILIATION AND SOLELY ON
THE BASIS OF THEIR ABILITY TO PERFORM THE DUTIES OF THE POSITION. THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY, WITH APPROVAL OF THE
EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE, MAY APPOINT ADDITIONAL PERSONNEL AS
NECESSARY TO PERFORM THE FUNCTIONS ASSIGNED TO THE ADMINISTRATOR
OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY BY THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE. THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY, AND ANY ADDITIONAL PERSONNEL
APPOINTED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY, IS AN
EMPLOYEE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE STATE
PERSONNEL SYSTEM LAWS.
(b) THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY IS THE PRIMARY
RECIPIENT OF COMPLAINTS RELATING TO CRIMINAL ACTIVITY AGAINST OR
SECURITY THREATS OR RISKS TO A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND
SERVES AS THE PRIMARY COORDINATOR OF ALL SECURITY AND PROTECTION
EFFORTS FOR COVERED INDIVIDUALS IN COORDINATION WITH THE COLORADO
STATE PATROL. THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY SHALL
IDENTIFY AND ASSESS THE NATURE OF SECURITY NEEDS AND RISKS IN AND
AROUND THE STATE CAPITOL BUILDINGS COMPLEX, FOR COVERED
INDIVIDUALS IN THEIR DISTRICTS, AND FOR FUNCTIONS OR EVENTS ATTENDED
BY COVERED INDIVIDUALS. IN DETERMINING AN APPROPRIATE RESPONSE TO
ANY SECURITY NEED OR RISK, THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY
SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE COLORADO STATE PATROL AND MAY
COORDINATE WITH LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AND THE SERGEANTS AT ARMS
OF EACH HOUSE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SECTION 2-2-402. THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY SHALL
DEVELOP RECOMMENDED POLICIES AND PROCEDURES FOR THE EXECUTIVE
COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL TO CONSIDER IN CONNECTION
WITH CRIMINAL ACTIVITY AGAINST OR SECURITY THREATS OR RISKS TO
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

COVERED INDIVIDUALS.
(c) THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY PERFORMS THEIR
DUTIES UNDER THE DIRECTION AND SUPERVISION OF THE EXECUTIVE
COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL AND RETAINS THE DISCRETION TO
DETERMINE THE NEED FOR SECURITY AND PROTECTION SERVICES BASED ON
WHERE PROTECTION AND SECURITY SERVICES ARE REQUESTED, THE
ESTIMATED LEVEL OF THREAT OR RISK TO A COVERED INDIVIDUAL, STAFFING
REQUIREMENTS, AND ANY POLICY DIRECTION ESTABLISHED BY THE
EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL.
(3) (a) THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY, AND ANY
PERSONNEL APPOINTED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY TO
ASSIST IN PERFORMING THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY'S
DUTIES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, IS A PEACE
OFFICER WHOSE AUTHORITY INCLUDES ENFORCING ALL LAWS OF THE STATE
AND WHO MAY BE CERTIFIED BY THE P.O.S.T. BOARD AS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 16-2.5-154.
(b) (I) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
SHALL SUBMIT A SUNRISE APPLICATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 16-2.5-201
BY JULY 1, 2026, TO DETERMINE IF ANY CHANGE IN PEACE OFFICER STATUS
IS NECESSARY.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2028.
(4) IN ADDITION TO THE DUTIES SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION, THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY SHALL:
(a) UPON REQUEST OF THE SECRETARY OF THE SENATE OR THE CHIEF
CLERK OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, CONSULT WITH THE SECRETARY
OF THE SENATE OR THE CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
REGARDING THE APPOINTMENT, SUPERVISION, AND TRAINING OF THE
SERGEANTS AT ARMS OF THEIR RESPECTIVE CHAMBER PURSUANT TO SECTION
2-2-402;
(b) COORDINATE THE INSTALLATION OF HOME SECURITY SYSTEMS
FOR MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE
APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR THE RECEIPT OF GIFTS,
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FOR THAT PURPOSE;
(c) IN COORDINATION WITH THE COLORADO STATE PATROL, ASSESS
AND PLAN FOR SECURITY NEEDS RELATED TO TOWN HALLS, DISTRICT EVENTS,
AND OTHER OFFICIAL FUNCTIONS ATTENDED BY COVERED INDIVIDUALS AND
DIRECT THE DEPLOYMENT OF APPROPRIATE COLORADO STATE PATROL
RESOURCES FOR SUCH EVENTS; AND
(d) IN COORDINATION WITH THE COLORADO STATE PATROL, ENSURE
THAT COVERED INDIVIDUALS ARE AWARE OF THE PROTECTION AND SECURITY
SERVICES THAT THEY MAY REQUEST FROM THE ADMINISTRATOR OF
LEGISLATIVE SAFETY PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND FROM THE COLORADO
STATE PATROL PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-33.5-216.5.
(5) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL SHALL
ESTABLISH A PROCESS BY WHICH A COVERED INDIVIDUAL MAY REQUEST
PROTECTION FROM THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION. ALL SUCH REQUESTS SHALL BE DIRECTED THROUGH THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY AS THE PRIMARY POINT OF
CONTACT.
(6) THIS SECTION DOES NOT IMPACT THE SECURITY THAT THE
COLORADO STATE PATROL PROVIDES PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-33.5-216.5.
THE COLORADO STATE PATROL REMAINS THE PRIMARY POLICE AGENCY FOR
THE STATE CAPITOL BUILDINGS COMPLEX AND THE PRIMARY SOURCE OF
SECURITY FOR MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-402, amend (1)
and (2) as follows:
2-2-402. Sergeants at arms.
(1) Each house of the general assembly may appoint a chief security
officer SERGEANTS AT ARMS to ensure the orderly operation of each house
and committees thereof. Such chief security officers SERGEANTS AT ARMS
shall perform the duties of the house employing them IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY PURSUANT TO SECTION
2-2-329 (4)(a), IF DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES OR THE SECRETARY OF THE SENATE, AS APPLICABLE,
and shall be under the direction of one or more members or officers of such
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

house as may be designated in the rules of each house.
(2) Such chief security officers THE SERGEANTS AT ARMS are hereby
designated to be peace officers and shall have jurisdiction to act as such in
the performance of their duties anywhere within the state.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 16-2.5-131 as
follows:
16-2.5-131. Sergeants at arms for the general assembly.
The chief security officer SERGEANTS AT ARMS for the general
assembly is a peace officer ARE PEACE OFFICERS while engaged in the
performance of his or her THEIR duties whose authority shall be IS limited
pursuant to section 2-2-402. C.R.S.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 16-2.5-154 as
follows:
16-2.5-154. Administrator of legislative safety for the general
assembly.
THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY FOR THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, AND ANY PERSONNEL APPOINTED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR OF
LEGISLATIVE SAFETY TO ASSIST IN PERFORMING THE ADMINISTRATOR OF
LEGISLATIVE SAFETY'S DUTIES PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-2-329, IS A PEACE
OFFICER WHOSE AUTHORITY INCLUDES ENFORCING ALL LAWS OF THE STATE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-2-329 (3) AND WHO MAY BE CERTIFIED BY THE
P.O.S.T. BOARD.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-33.5-216 as
follows:
24-33.5-216. Patrol services furnished to governor and
lieutenant governor - jurisdiction of state patrol - executive residence.
(1) The chief shall provide a motor vehicle and driver for the use of
the governor of the state during his THE GOVERNOR'S term of office. The
chief shall also assign officers to protect the governor and his THE
GOVERNOR'S immediate family. Officers assigned to this duty shall be
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

selected by the chief with the approval of the governor. The chief shall also
provide a motor vehicle for the lieutenant governor and, at the discretion of
the governor, may assign an officer to provide protection for the lieutenant
governor in the performance of the duties of such office. The chief shall
also make available an officer to protect any governor-elect.
(2) THE COLORADO STATE PATROL'S JURISDICTION INCLUDES LAW
ENFORCEMENT SERVICES FOR THE EXECUTIVE RESIDENCE AT 400 EAST 8TH
AVENUE, DENVER.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-33.5-216.5
as follows:
24-33.5-216.5. Patrol services furnished to the general assembly
- judges and justices - definitions.
(1) (a) The Colorado state patrol shall provide protection for the
members of the general assembly AND OTHER COVERED INDIVIDUALS when
they are present in the state capitol buildings group COMPLEX and shall
respond to all complaints relating to criminal activity against or security
threats or risks to a member of the general assembly As used in this
subsection (1), "state capitol buildings group" has the same meaning as set
forth in section 24-82-105 (1)(a) OR OTHER COVERED INDIVIDUAL. IN
PROVIDING SUCH PROTECTION AND RESPONSE, THE COLORADO STATE
PATROL SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE
SAFETY APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-2-329, WHO SERVES AS THE
PRIMARY POINT OF CONTACT FOR MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND
OTHER COVERED INDIVIDUALS ON SECURITY MATTERS.
(b) The Colorado state patrol shall provide protection to Colorado
judges and justices when they are present in the state capitol buildings
group COMPLEX.
(2) The Colorado state patrol shall provide PATROL'S JURISDICTION
INCLUDES law enforcement services for the buildings, grounds, and other
facilities in which the general assembly designates and assigns space in
accordance with section 2-2-321. C.R.S. The state patrol shall coordinate
such law enforcement efforts, when appropriate, with local law enforcement
agencies, and with THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY APPOINTED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-2-329, AND WITH the security officers SERGEANTS
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

AT ARMS of each house of the general assembly appointed in accordance
with section 2-2-402. C.R.S.
(3) (a) In addition to the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, the Colorado state patrol may render other protection and
security services as may be requested by the ADMINISTRATOR OF
LEGISLATIVE SAFETY, THE president of the senate, the minority leader of the
senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, or the minority leader of
the house of representatives on behalf of any member of the general
assembly.
(b) The Colorado state patrol may provide protection and security
services as described in subsection (3)(a) of this section for any function
held in Colorado at which a member of the general assembly is in
attendance in an official capacity with appropriate coordination with local
law enforcement. Factors to be considered when determining the need for
providing these services include, but are not limited to, the location of the
function, the estimated level of threat or risk associated with the function,
and staffing requirements.
(c) In addition to the protection and security services provided
pursuant to subsections (3)(a) and (3)(b) of this section, the Colorado state
patrol may provide other protection and security services to a member of the
general assembly OR OTHER COVERED INDIVIDUAL as requested by the
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY OR executive committee of the
legislative council and as deemed necessary by the chief of the Colorado
state patrol.
(4) The executive committee of the legislative council shall establish
a process by which a member of the general assembly OR OTHER COVERED
INDIVIDUAL may request protection from THROUGH THE ADMINISTRATOR OF
LEGISLATIVE SAFETY TO BE PROVIDED BY the Colorado state patrol pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section. IN PROVIDING PROTECTION PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION, THE COLORADO STATE PATROL SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY.
(5) The Colorado state patrol shall ensure, THROUGH COORDINATION
WITH THE ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY, that members of the
general assembly AND OTHER COVERED INDIVIDUALS are aware of the
protection and security services that may be requested THEY MAY REQUEST
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

from the Colorado state patrol pursuant to this section AND FROM THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-2-329.
(6) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY" MEANS THE
ADMINISTRATOR OF LEGISLATIVE SAFETY APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 2-2-329.
(b) "COVERED INDIVIDUAL" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 2-2-329 (1).
(c) "STATE CAPITOL BUILDINGS COMPLEX" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 24-82-105 (1)(a).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-82-105, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
24-82-105. Security for state capitol buildings complex -
jurisdiction of law enforcement personnel on state property.
(1) (a) IN ADDITION TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE COLORADO STATE
PATROL PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-33.5-216.5, the city and county of Denver
is granted jurisdiction to enforce the laws of the state of Colorado for the
security of persons and property in the state capitol buildings group
COMPLEX. In addition, the city and county of Denver is granted jurisdiction
to enforce the ordinances of the city and county of Denver for the security
of such persons and property. For the purposes of this subsection (1) and
such enforcement, the ordinances of the city and county of Denver relating
to access to and conduct on properties of the city and county of Denver
referred to as parks shall likewise apply to the grounds of the state capitol
buildings group COMPLEX, as to persons not having business thereon; except
that the powers of the manager of parks and recreation enumerated in such
ordinance shall not apply to such grounds. As used in this subsection (1),
"state capitol buildings group COMPLEX" means those state-owned
buildings, together with the state-owned grounds adjacent thereto, in the
city and county of Denver within the area bounded on the north by
Sixteenth avenue, on the west by Broadway, on the south by Eleventh
avenue, and on the east by Grant street, as shown on the official maps of the
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

city and county of Denver.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-45-108, amend (3)(c)
as follows:
1-45-108. Disclosure - definitions - repeal.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3.5) of this section,
all candidate committees, political committees, small donor committees, and
political parties shall register with the appropriate officer before accepting
or making any contributions. Registration shall include a statement listing:
(c) A street OR MAILING address and telephone number for the
principal place of operations;
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-45-110, amend (2)(c)
as follows:
1-45-110. Candidate affidavit - disclosure statement.
(2) (c) A candidate must electronically file the disclosure statement
required in subsection (2)(a) of this section, and the secretary of state must
make all disclosure statements available to the public on its website. The
secretary may SHALL redact certain information such as a candidate's
address or AND other personal information BEFORE MAKING A DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AVAILABLE ON THE SECRETARY'S WEBSITE. THE SECRETARY
MAY ALSO MODIFY THE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT FORM TO ELIMINATE THE
INCLUSION OF CERTAIN PERSONAL INFORMATION.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-6-202, amend
(2)(c) and (5) as follows:
24-6-202. Disclosure - contents - filing - false or incomplete filing
- penalty.
(2) Disclosure must include the following for the previous calendar
year, unless otherwise specified:
(c) The legal description of Any interest in real property, including
an option to buy, in the state in which the person making disclosure, his
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

THEIR spouse, or minor children residing with him THEM have any interest,
direct or indirect, the market value of which is in excess of five thousand
dollars, AND THE CITY AND COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED;
(5) Each disclosure statement is public information and shall be
made available on the secretary of state's website. THE SECRETARY OF STATE
SHALL REDACT THE ADDRESS AND OTHER PERSONAL INFORMATION OF AN
INDIVIDUAL SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION BEFORE POSTING
THE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ON THE SECRETARY'S WEBSITE. THE
SECRETARY OF STATE MAY ALSO MODIFY THE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT FORM
TO ELIMINATE THE INCLUSION OF CERTAIN PERSONAL INFORMATION.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-1-114, add (2.5)
as follows:
13-1-114. Powers of court.
(2.5) A COUNTY SHERIFF PROVIDING SECURITY FOR A COURT SHALL
USE THE RECOMMENDED STANDARDS DEVELOPED BY THE JUDICIAL SECURITY
TASK FORCE PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-3-122 TO IMPLEMENT SECURITY
MEASURES FOR THE COURT. THE COUNTY SHERIFF SHALL, AT A MINIMUM
AND TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE:
(a) MAINTAIN ONE SECURE, SINGLE-POINT ACCESS TO A COURT
FACILITY;
(b) USE MAGNETOMETERS WHEN THE COURT IS IN SESSION; AND
(c) VERIFY THAT EACH INDIVIDUAL WHO ENTERS A COURTHOUSE
WITH A FIREARM IS AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-12-105.3 AND
MAINTAIN A LOG OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S VERIFICATION, EMPLOYING AGENCY
OR ENTITY, AND TIME OF ENTRY AND EXIT FROM THE COURTHOUSE; EXCEPT
THAT THIS SUBSECTION (2.5)(c) DOES NOT APPLY TO A PEACE OFFICER WHO
IS EMPLOYED IN THE COURTHOUSE BY THE COUNTY SHERIFF THAT HAS
JURISDICTION OVER THE COURTHOUSE.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-1-204, amend
(1)(b); and add (5) as follows:
13-1-204. Court security cash fund - creation - grants -
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

regulations.
(1) (b) A five-dollar surcharge must be assessed and collected as
provided by law on docket fees and jury fees for specified civil actions filed
on and after July 1, 2007, BUT BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, on docket fees for
criminal convictions entered on and after July 1, 2007, BUT BEFORE JULY 1,
2027, on filing fees for specified probate filings made on and after July 1,
2007, BUT BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, on docket fees for specified special
proceeding filings made on and after July 1, 2007, BUT BEFORE JULY 1,
2027, on fees for specified filings in water matters initiated on and after
July 1, 2007, BUT BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, on docket fees for specified traffic
infraction penalties assessed on and after July 1, 2007, BUT BEFORE JULY 1,
2027, and on docket fees for civil infraction penalties assessed on or after
March 1, 2022, BUT BEFORE JULY 1, 2027. The surcharge must be
transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the surcharge to the fund.
A SURCHARGE ASSESSED BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, BUT COLLECTED ON OR
AFTER JULY 1, 2027, MUST BE TRANSMITTED TO THE COURT SECURITY
AUTHORITY IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN SECTION 13-1-505 (2).
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, ON AUGUST 31, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL ISSUE A
WARRANT IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE BALANCE OF MONEY IN THE COURT
SECURITY CASH FUND TO THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY CREATED IN PART
5 OF THIS ARTICLE 1.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, recreate and reenact,
with amendments, 13-1-206 as follows:
13-1-206. Repeal of part.
THIS PART 2 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 5 to article
1 of title 13 as follows:
PART 5
COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY
13-1-501. Definitions.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

AS USED IN THIS PART 5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(1) "AUTHORITY" MEANS THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY CREATED
IN SECTION 13-1-502.
(2) "BOARD" MEANS THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY BOARD
CREATED IN SECTION 13-1-504.
(3) "CHIEF JUSTICE" MEANS THE CHIEF JUSTICE OF THE COLORADO
SUPREME COURT.
(4) "COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE" MEANS THE SURCHARGE
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-1-505 AND ASSESSED AND COLLECTED PURSUANT
TO THIS PART 5 ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2027.
(5) "LOCAL SECURITY TEAM" MEANS A GROUP OF INDIVIDUALS FROM
A COUNTY THAT OVERSEES ISSUES OF COURT SECURITY FOR THE COUNTY
AND THAT INCLUDES THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT IN THE
COUNTY OR THE CHIEF JUDGE'S DESIGNEE, THE SHERIFF OR THE SHERIFF'S
DESIGNEE, AND A COUNTY COMMISSIONER OR COUNTY MANAGER OR THEIR
DESIGNEE.
13-1-502. Creation and purpose.
(1) THERE IS CREATED AS A SPECIAL PURPOSE AUTHORITY, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102, THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY, WHICH
IS A BODY CORPORATE AND A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, WHICH
IS NOT AN AGENCY OF STATE GOVERNMENT AND IS NOT SUBJECT TO
ADMINISTRATIVE DIRECTION BY ANY DEPARTMENT, COMMISSION, BOARD,
BUREAU, OR AGENCY OF THE STATE.
(2) THE AUTHORITY IS RESPONSIBLE FOR DISTRIBUTING THE COURT
SECURITY SURCHARGE PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 13-1-506 AND 13-1-507 TO
PROVIDE:
(a) SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDING FOR ONGOING SECURITY STAFFING IN
STATE COURT AND PROBATION FACILITIES IN THE COUNTIES WITH THE MOST
LIMITED FINANCIAL RESOURCES;
(b) SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDING FOR COUNTIES FOR COURT SECURITY
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

EQUIPMENT COSTS, TRAINING OF LOCAL SECURITY TEAMS ON ISSUES OF
STATE COURT SECURITY, AND EMERGENCY NEEDS RELATED TO COURT
SECURITY; AND
(c) SUPPORT FOR GENERAL SYSTEM-WIDE COURT SECURITY NEEDS
INCLUDING SECURITY SUPPORT FOR JUDGES AND JUDICIAL STAFF OUTSIDE OF
COURT FACILITIES WHEN NECESSARY.
13-1-503. General powers.
(1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER POWERS GRANTED TO THE
AUTHORITY IN THIS PART 5, THE AUTHORITY HAS THE FOLLOWING POWERS:
(a) TO HAVE THE DUTIES, PRIVILEGES, IMMUNITIES, RIGHTS,
LIABILITIES, AND DISABILITIES OF A BODY CORPORATE AND POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;
(b) TO HAVE PERPETUAL EXISTENCE AND SUCCESSION;
(c) TO ADOPT, HAVE, AND USE A SEAL AND TO ALTER THE SAME AT
ITS PLEASURE;
(d) TO SUE AND BE SUED;
(e) TO ENTER INTO ANY CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT CONSISTENT
WITH THIS PART 5 AND THE LAWS OF THE STATE;
(f) TO PURCHASE, LEASE, LEASE WITH AN OPTION TO PURCHASE,
TRADE, EXCHANGE, OR OTHERWISE ACQUIRE, MAINTAIN, HOLD, IMPROVE,
MORTGAGE, ENCUMBER, AND DISPOSE OF REAL PROPERTY AND PERSONAL
PROPERTY, WHETHER TANGIBLE OR INTANGIBLE, AND ANY INTEREST,
INCLUDING EASEMENTS AND RIGHTS-OF-WAY, WITHOUT RESTRICTION OR
LIMITATION;
(g) TO ACQUIRE OFFICE SPACE, EQUIPMENT, SERVICES, SUPPLIES, AND
INSURANCE NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 5;
(h) TO DEPOSIT ANY MONEY OF THE AUTHORITY IN ANY BANKING
INSTITUTION OR IN ANY DEPOSITORY AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-75-603 AND TO APPOINT, FOR THE PURPOSE OF MAKING SUCH DEPOSITS,
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

ONE OR MORE PERSONS TO ACT AS CUSTODIANS OF THE MONEY OF THE
AUTHORITY, WHO SHALL GIVE SURETY BONDS IN THE AMOUNTS AND FORM
AND FOR THE PURPOSES THE BOARD REQUIRES;
(i) TO CONTRACT FOR AND TO ACCEPT ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, AND
LOANS OF FUNDS, PROPERTY, OR ANY OTHER AID IN ANY FORM FROM THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, ANY STATE AGENCY, OR ANY OTHER
SOURCE, OR ANY COMBINATION THEREOF, AND TO COMPLY, SUBJECT TO THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS PART 5, WITH THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE
CONTRACTS OR THE ACCEPTANCE OF SUCH ITEMS;
(j) TO HAVE AND EXERCISE ALL RIGHTS AND POWERS NECESSARY OR
INCIDENTAL TO OR IMPLIED FROM THE SPECIFIC POWERS GRANTED IN THIS
PART 5, WHICH SPECIFIC POWERS SHALL NOT BE CONSIDERED AS A
LIMITATION UPON ANY POWER NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE TO CARRY OUT
THE PURPOSES AND INTENT OF THIS PART 5;
(k) TO FIX THE TIME AND PLACE OR PLACES AT WHICH ITS REGULAR
AND SPECIAL MEETINGS ARE HELD;
(l) TO ELECT ONE MEMBER AS CHAIR AND ONE MEMBER AS
VICE-CHAIR OF THE BOARD, TO ELECT ONE OR MORE MEMBERS AS
SECRETARY AND TREASURER OF THE BOARD, AND TO ELECT OR APPOINT
OTHER OFFICERS AS THE BOARD MAY DETERMINE AND PROVIDE FOR THEIR
DUTIES AND TERMS OF OFFICE;
(m) TO APPOINT AGENTS, EMPLOYEES, AND PROFESSIONAL AND
BUSINESS ADVISERS, INCLUDING REAL ESTATE PROFESSIONALS,
CONSTRUCTION COMPANIES, PROPERTY MANAGERS, ATTORNEYS,
ACCOUNTANTS, AND FINANCIAL ADVISERS AS MAY BE NECESSARY IN THE
AUTHORITY'S JUDGMENT TO ACCOMPLISH THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 5, TO
FIX THE COMPENSATION OF THOSE AGENTS, EMPLOYEES, AND ADVISERS, AND
TO ESTABLISH THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF ALL AGENTS, EMPLOYEES, AND
ADVISERS, AS WELL AS ANY OTHER PERSON CONTRACTING WITH THE
AUTHORITY TO PROVIDE SERVICES, INCLUDING TERMINATION OF
EMPLOYMENT OR THE CONTRACT FOR SERVICES;
(n) TO MAKE AND EXECUTE AGREEMENTS, CONTRACTS, AND OTHER
INSTRUMENTS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT IN THE EXERCISE OF THE POWERS
AND FUNCTIONS OF THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5, INCLUDING
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

CONTRACTS WITH ANY PERSON, FIRM, CORPORATION, MUNICIPALITY, STATE
AGENCY, COUNTY, OR OTHER ENTITY. ALL MUNICIPALITIES, COUNTIES, AND
STATE AGENCIES MAY ENTER INTO AND DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY TO
PERFORM ANY ARRANGEMENT OR CONTRACT WITH THE AUTHORITY; AND
(o) OTHER POWERS NECESSARY TO ACCOMPLISH THE AUTHORITY'S
SPECIFIC GOALS AS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5.
13-1-504. Court security authority board - membership and
meetings - rules.
(1) THE AUTHORITY IS GOVERNED BY THE COURT SECURITY
AUTHORITY BOARD, WHICH SHALL EVALUATE GRANT APPLICATIONS
RECEIVED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5 FOR AWARDING GRANTS FROM
REVENUE FROM THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE.
(2) (a) THE BOARD IS COMPOSED OF SEVEN MEMBERS AS FOLLOWS:
(I) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF A STATEWIDE ASSOCIATION THAT
REPRESENTS COUNTY COMMISSIONERS WHO ARE RECOMMENDED BY THE
ASSOCIATION AND WHO ARE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(II) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF A STATEWIDE ASSOCIATION THAT
REPRESENTS COUNTY SHERIFFS WHO ARE RECOMMENDED BY THE
ASSOCIATION AND WHO ARE APPOINTED BY GOVERNOR;
(III) TWO MEMBERS OF THE JUDICIAL BRANCH, AT LEAST ONE OF
WHOM IS A CHIEF JUDGE, WHO ARE APPOINTED BY THE CHIEF JUSTICE; AND
(IV) ONE MEMBER OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC WHO IS APPOINTED BY
THE CHIEF JUSTICE.
(b) INITIAL APPOINTMENTS TO THE BOARD MUST BE MADE BY JULY
1, 2026.
(c) FOR THE INITIAL APPOINTMENTS TO THE BOARD PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, EACH APPOINTING AUTHORITY SHALL
APPOINT THE SAME INDIVIDUAL WHO THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY
APPOINTED TO SERVE AND WHO IS SERVING AS A MEMBER OF THE COURT
SECURITY CASH FUND COMMISSION PURSUANT TO PART 2 OF THIS ARTICLE 1
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

AT THE TIME WHEN THE INITIAL APPOINTMENTS TO THE BOARD ARE MADE.
(d) ANY TIME THAT AN APPOINTEE TO THE BOARD SERVED AS A
MEMBER OF THE COURT SECURITY CASH FUND COMMISSION, WHETHER OR
NOT THE APPOINTEE IS AN INITIAL APPOINTMENT TO THE BOARD, DOES NOT
COUNT TOWARD THE TERM LIMITS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (3) OR (6) OF
THIS SECTION.
(e) THE BOARD MEMBERSHIP DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF
THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE, AT ALL TIMES, AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE
FROM A COUNTY IN WHICH THE POPULATION IS ABOVE THE MEDIAN COUNTY
POPULATION FOR THE STATE OF COLORADO, AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST
RECENT DATA PUBLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS, AND AT
LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM A COUNTY IN WHICH THE POPULATION IS
BELOW THE MEDIAN COUNTY POPULATION FOR THE STATE OF COLORADO, AS
DETERMINED BY THE MOST RECENT DATA PUBLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF LOCAL AFFAIRS.
(3) THE TERM OF OFFICE OF EACH MEMBER OF THE BOARD IS THREE
YEARS; EXCEPT THAT FOR THE INITIAL APPOINTMENTS TO THE BOARD, THE
GOVERNOR AND THE CHIEF JUSTICE SHALL BOTH APPOINT TWO BOARD
MEMBERS FOR THREE-YEAR TERMS, THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT TWO
BOARD MEMBERS FOR TWO-YEAR TERMS, AND THE CHIEF JUSTICE SHALL
APPOINT ONE BOARD MEMBER FOR A TWO-YEAR TERM. A VACANCY IS FILLED
BY THE RESPECTIVE APPOINTING AUTHORITY FOR THE UNEXPIRED TERM
ONLY.
(4) MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION BUT
MUST BE REIMBURSED FOR ACTUAL AND REASONABLE EXPENSES INCURRED
IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES.
(5) TERMS EXPIRE ON DECEMBER 31 OF THE FINAL YEAR OF THE
TERM.
(6) MEMBERS MAY BE REAPPOINTED TO SERVE TWO ADDITIONAL
TERMS.
(7) A MEMBER MAY BE REMOVED FROM THE BOARD BY MAJORITY
VOTE OF THE BOARD FOR MISFEASANCE, MALFEASANCE, WILLFUL NEGLECT
OF DUTY, OR OTHER CAUSE AFTER NOTICE AND A PUBLIC HEARING, UNLESS
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

NOTICE AND A PUBLIC HEARING ARE EXPRESSLY WAIVED IN WRITING BY THE
MEMBER BEING REMOVED.
(8) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST FOUR TIMES PER YEAR.
(9) THE BOARD SHALL ELECT A CHAIR AND VICE-CHAIR AT ITS FIRST
MEETING OF EACH CALENDAR YEAR.
(10) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT ITS OWN RULES OF PROCEDURE AND
KEEP A RECORD OF ALL PROCEEDINGS.
(11) THE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE A SCHEDULE FOR ACCEPTING
APPLICATIONS FOR GRANTS AWARDED FROM REVENUE FROM THE COURT
SECURITY SURCHARGE AND AWARDING GRANTS. THE BOARD, BY
RESOLUTION, SHALL ESTABLISH RULES TO ENSURE THAT A GRANT RECIPIENT
USES MONEY RECEIVED FROM A GRANT FOR PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SECTIONS
13-1-506 AND 13-1-507 AND TO DETERMINE THE GRANT DISTRIBUTION
AMOUNT FOR A COUNTY THAT HAS APPLIED FOR A GRANT OR FOR THE STATE
COURT ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE, IF APPLICABLE.
(12) (a) THE AUTHORITY MAY COOPERATE AND ENTER INTO
CONTRACTS WITH ANOTHER AGENCY OR ENTITY FOR ADMINISTRATIVE OR
OPERATIONAL ASSISTANCE, INCLUDING FOR STAFFING.
(b) THE AUTHORITY SHALL PAY THE CONTRACTED ENTITY IN
ADVANCE FOR ALL AGREED UPON COSTS INCURRED BY THE CONTRACTED
ENTITY IN PROVIDING STAFFING FOR THE AUTHORITY TO CARRY OUT ITS
MISSION, INCLUDING COMPENSATION FOR EMPLOYEES STAFFING THE
AUTHORITY AND ANY ADMINISTRATIVE AND INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED
WITH STAFFING THE AUTHORITY.
(c) IF THE CONTRACTED ENTITY EXPECTS TO INCUR ACTUAL COSTS
AS A RESULT OF STAFFING THE AUTHORITY THAT EXCEED THE AMOUNT THE
AUTHORITY RETAINS FOR DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS PURSUANT TO
SECTION 13-1-506, THE AUTHORITY SHALL PAY THE CONTRACTED ENTITY
FOR ALL COSTS INCURRED BY THE CONTRACTED ENTITY IN PROVIDING
STAFFING TO THE AUTHORITY, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO,
COMPENSATION FOR EMPLOYEES STAFFING THE AUTHORITY AND
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS IN AN AMOUNT AGREED UPON BY THE AUTHORITY
AND CONTRACTED ENTITY.
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(13) THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR SHALL REIMBURSE THE
BOARD, FROM THE COURT SECURITY CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
13-1-204, FOR REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES FOR LEGAL SERVICES PROVIDED
TO THE BOARD FROM JULY 1, 2026, TO AUGUST 30, 2027.
13-1-505. Imposition and collection of the court security
surcharge - repeal.
(1) (a) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE AUTHORITY SHALL IMPOSE,
AND THE COURT SHALL COLLECT ON BEHALF OF THE AUTHORITY, A COURT
SECURITY SURCHARGE IN THE AMOUNT OF TEN DOLLARS ON THE FOLLOWING:
(I) DOCKET FEES FOR SPECIFIED CIVIL ACTIONS FILED IN DISTRICT
COURT AND COUNTY COURT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-32-101 (1);
(II) JURY FEES FOR SPECIFIED CIVIL ACTIONS PURSUANT TO SECTION
13-71-144 (1);
(III) DOCKET FEES FOR CRIMINAL CONVICTIONS PURSUANT TO
SECTION 13-32-105;
(IV) FILING FEES FOR SPECIFIED PROBATE FILINGS PURSUANT TO
SECTION 13-32-102 (1);
(V) DOCKET FEES FOR SPECIFIED SPECIAL PROCEEDING FILINGS
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-32-103;
(VI) DOCKET FEES FOR SPECIFIED TRAFFIC INFRACTION PENALTIES
PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-4-1710; AND
(VII) DOCKET FEES FOR CIVIL INFRACTION PENALTIES PURSUANT TO
SECTION 16-2.3-102.
(b) TO MINIMIZE COMPLIANCE COSTS FOR COURT USERS AND
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS FOR THE AUTHORITY, THE COURT SHALL COLLECT
THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE ON BEHALF OF THE AUTHORITY IN THE
SAME MANNER IN WHICH IT COLLECTED THE COURT SECURITY CASH FUND
SURCHARGE PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-1-204 (1)(b), AS THAT SECTION
EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL IN 2027; EXCEPT THAT THE COURT SHALL NOT
TRANSMIT THE COLLECTED COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE TO THE STATE
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

TREASURER FOR DEPOSIT INTO THE COURT SECURITY CASH FUND BUT SHALL
INSTEAD REMIT THE SURCHARGES COLLECTED TO THE AUTHORITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCESS DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (a) THE AUTHORITY SHALL MAINTAIN AN ACCOUNT IN A
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION TO WHICH ALL MONEY COLLECTED FOR THE COURT
SECURITY SURCHARGE IS DEPOSITED. THE AUTHORITY SHALL WORK WITH
THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT TO DEVELOP A PROCESS THAT ENSURES EACH
COURT IS ABLE TO PROMPTLY AND EFFICIENTLY DEPOSIT ALL COURT
SECURITY SURCHARGES COLLECTED DIRECTLY TO THE ACCOUNT OR
OTHERWISE PROMPTLY AND EFFICIENTLY REMIT THE SURCHARGES TO THE
AUTHORITY.
(b) (I) THE AUTHORITY SHALL DEPOSIT ANY AMOUNT THAT THE
STATE TREASURER REMITS TO THE AUTHORITY ON AUGUST 31, 2027,
PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-1-204 (5), INTO THE ACCOUNT CREATED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2028.
(3) COURT SECURITY SURCHARGES COLLECTED AND REMITTED TO
THE AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION ARE NOT STATE REVENUE.
13-1-506. Distribution of court security surcharge - grants -
purposes.
(1) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ACCEPT APPLICATIONS FOR GRANT
AWARDS DISTRIBUTED FROM THE MONEY DEPOSITED INTO THE AUTHORITY'S
ACCOUNT AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 13-1-505 (2), LESS THE AUTHORITY'S
DIRECT AND INDIRECT EXPENSES IN ADMINISTERING THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS PART 5 AND ANY OTHER RELATED WORK COMPLETED TO ADVANCE THE
MISSION OF THE AUTHORITY. THE AUTHORITY SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE
REVENUE TO COUNTIES THROUGH GRANTS PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-1-507.
IN ADDITION, THE AUTHORITY MAY DISTRIBUTE GRANTS TO THE STATE
COURT ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE TO PROVIDE SUPPORT FOR GENERAL
SYSTEM-WIDE COURT SECURITY NEEDS, INCLUDING SECURITY SUPPORT FOR
JUDGES AND JUDICIAL STAFF OUTSIDE OF COURT FACILITIES WHEN
NECESSARY.
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(2) THE BOARD, BY RESOLUTION, SHALL ESTABLISH GUIDELINES TO
DISTRIBUTE GRANTS TO COUNTIES AND TO THE STATE COURT
ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED IN THIS PART 5.
(3) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PRINCIPLES SET OUT IN SECTION
13-1-507, THE AUTHORITY SHALL, BY RESOLUTION, ESTABLISH GUIDELINES
PRESCRIBING THE PROCEDURES TO BE FOLLOWED IN MAKING, FILING, AND
EVALUATING GRANT APPLICATIONS, THE CRITERIA FOR EVALUATION, AND
OTHER GUIDELINES NECESSARY FOR ADMINISTERING THE MONEY FROM THE
COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE.
13-1-507. Grant applications - requirements.
(1) (a) FOR A COUNTY TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR MONEY DISTRIBUTED BY
THE AUTHORITY, A LOCAL SECURITY TEAM MUST APPLY TO THE BOARD ON
BEHALF OF THE COUNTY IN A FORM AND MANNER TO BE DETERMINED BY THE
BOARD. FOR THE BOARD TO CONSIDER A GRANT APPLICATION FROM A
COUNTY, THE APPLICATION MUST BE SIGNED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE
AUTHORITY OF EACH ENTITY THAT IS REPRESENTED ON THE LOCAL SECURITY
TEAM.
(b) FOR THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE TO BE ELIGIBLE
FOR MONEY DISTRIBUTED BY THE AUTHORITY, THE OFFICE MUST APPLY TO
THE BOARD IN A FORM AND MANNER TO BE DETERMINED BY THE BOARD. FOR
THE BOARD TO CONSIDER A GRANT APPLICATION FROM THE OFFICE, THE
APPLICATION MUST BE SIGNED BY THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR.
(2) (a) (I) A COUNTY THAT RECEIVES MONEY FROM A GRANT MUST
USE THE MONEY TO:
(A) PROVIDE COURT SECURITY STAFFING AT A FACILITY CONTAINING
A STATE COURT OR PROBATION OFFICE;
(B) PURCHASE SECURITY EQUIPMENT OR RELATED STRUCTURAL
IMPROVEMENTS FOR A FACILITY CONTAINING A STATE COURT OR PROBATION
OFFICE;
(C) PROVIDE TRAINING ON ISSUES OF COURT SECURITY; OR
(D) ADDRESS OTHER FUNDING NEEDS ASSOCIATED WITH ISSUES OF
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

COURT SECURITY OR SECURITY EQUIPMENT.
(II) A COUNTY THAT RECEIVES MONEY FROM A GRANT SHALL NOT
USE THE MONEY TO SUPPLANT MONEY ALREADY ALLOCATED BY THE COUNTY
FOR SUCH PURPOSES.
(b) IF THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE RECEIVES MONEY
FROM A GRANT, THE OFFICE MUST USE THE MONEY TO PROVIDE SUPPORT FOR
GENERAL SYSTEM-WIDE SECURITY OF FACILITIES CONTAINING A STATE
COURT OR PROBATION OFFICE, INCLUDING SECURITY SUPPORT FOR JUDGES
AND JUDICIAL STAFF OUTSIDE OF COURT FACILITIES WHEN NECESSARY.
(3) THE BOARD SHALL AWARD GRANTS FROM MONEY COLLECTED
FROM THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE. THE BOARD SHALL PRIORITIZE
REQUESTS FROM COUNTIES THAT SATISFY THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION AND REQUESTS FOR PERSONNEL COSTS. THE
BOARD MAY ALSO CONSIDER REQUESTS FROM THE STATE COURT
ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE IN A PRIORITY TO BE DETERMINED BY THE BOARD.
(4) (a) THE BOARD SHALL GIVE THE HIGHEST PRIORITY FOR GRANTS
PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5 TO COUNTIES THAT SATISFY AT LEAST TWO OF THE
FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(I) COUNTIES IN WHICH THE TOTAL POPULATION IS BELOW THE
MEDIAN COUNTY POPULATION FOR THE STATE, AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST
RECENT DATA PUBLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS;
(II) COUNTIES IN WHICH THE PER CAPITA INCOME IS BELOW THE
STATE MEDIAN, AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST RECENT DATA PUBLISHED BY
THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS;
(III) COUNTIES IN WHICH PROPERTY TAX REVENUES ARE BELOW THE
STATE MEDIAN, AS DETERMINED BY THE MOST RECENT DATA PUBLISHED BY
THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS; OR
(IV) COUNTIES IN WHICH THE TOTAL COUNTY POPULATION LIVING
BELOW THE FEDERAL POVERTY LINE IS GREATER THAN THE STATE MEDIAN
POPULATION LIVING BELOW THE FEDERAL POVERTY LINE, AS DETERMINED BY
THE MOST RECENT CENSUS PUBLISHED BY THE UNITED STATES BUREAU OF
THE CENSUS.
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(b) AFTER AWARDING GRANTS BASED ON THE PRIORITY SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD MAY GIVE THE NEXT
HIGHEST PRIORITY FOR GRANTS TO COUNTIES PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5 TO
PROVIDE SECURITY TO PROBATION OFFICES IN THE COUNTY WITHOUT
REGARD TO THE COUNTY'S TOTAL POPULATION, PER CAPITA INCOME,
PROPERTY TAX REVENUES, OR PERCENTAGE OF THE POPULATION LIVING
BELOW THE FEDERAL POVERTY LINE.
13-1-508. Report.
(1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
JANUARY 31 THEREAFTER, THE AUTHORITY SHALL PREPARE AND SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE CHIEF JUSTICE AND THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
JUDICIARY COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE JUDICIARY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR
SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, THAT DETAILS THE USE OF THE COURT SECURITY
SURCHARGES. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION
ABOUT THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE FROM THE PRECEDING YEAR:
(a) THE AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT WAS COLLECTED IN COURT
SECURITY SURCHARGES AND DEPOSITED IN THE AUTHORITY'S ACCOUNT AS
REQUIRED BY SECTION 13-1-505 (2);
(b) THE AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT WAS AWARDED TO EACH COUNTY
THROUGH A GRANT PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5;
(c) THE TYPES OF COURTHOUSE SECURITY MEASURES IMPLEMENTED
BY COUNTIES THAT RECEIVED A GRANT PURSUANT TO THIS PART 5; AND
(d) THE AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT WAS AWARDED TO THE STATE
COURT ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE THROUGH A GRANT PURSUANT TO THIS
PART 5 AND THE SECURITY MEASURES THAT THE OFFICE IMPLEMENTED USING
THE GRANT MONEY.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-3-122 as
follows:
13-3-122. Judicial security task force - recommended standards
for security at courthouses - court and probation facilities - repeal.
(1) (a) THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR SHALL CONVENE A
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

JUDICIAL SECURITY TASK FORCE TO DEVELOP RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
IMPROVING SECURITY AT COURTHOUSES AND OTHER COURT AND PROBATION
FACILITIES. THE TASK FORCE MUST INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM,
REPRESENTATIVES OF ASSOCIATIONS THAT REPRESENT COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS AND SHERIFFS.
(b) THE TASK FORCE SHALL CONVENE AT LEAST ONE PUBLIC
HEARING, WHICH MAY BE CONDUCTED VIRTUALLY.
(c) THE TASK FORCE SHALL SUBMIT A WRITTEN REPORT ON ITS
PROGRESS TO THE JUDICIARY COMMITTEES OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES AND THE SENATE, OR ANY SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, AND
THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE NO LATER THAN JANUARY 1, 2027.
(2) THE TASK FORCE SHALL DEVELOP RECOMMENDED STANDARDS
FOR:
(a) SECURE PUBLIC ACCESS POINTS TO FACILITIES CONTAINING A
STATE COURT OR PROBATION OFFICE;
(b) SECURE ACCESS TO FACILITIES CONTAINING A STATE COURT OR
PROBATION OFFICE FOR JUDGES, STAFF, ATTORNEYS, AND LAW
ENFORCEMENT;
(c) SECURITY FOR FACILITIES AND PERSONNEL DURING HIGH-PROFILE
TRIALS;
(d) SECURE PARKING FACILITIES;
(e) SECURE PUBLIC SPACES;
(f) ACCESS FOR NON-COURT OFFICES HOUSED WITHIN COURTHOUSES;
AND
(g) QUALIFICATIONS FOR SECURITY STAFF.
(3) (a) THE TASK FORCE SHALL DEVELOP A RECOMMENDED PROCESS
FOR INCIDENT REPORTING AT COURTHOUSES AND OTHER COURT AND
PROBATION FACILITIES AND SHALL MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING
THE CREATION, COMPOSITION, AND PRACTICES OF LOCAL SECURITY
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

COMMITTEES.
(b) THE TASK FORCE SHALL DEFINE THE MEMBERSHIP, STRUCTURE,
AND ROLE OF THE LOCAL SECURITY COMMITTEES IN ITS RECOMMENDATIONS.
THE TASK FORCE MAY ALSO IDENTIFY IN ITS RECOMMENDATIONS THE MOST
APPROPRIATE NAME FOR THE LOCAL SECURITY COMMITTEES.
(4) IN DEVELOPING THE RECOMMENDED STANDARDS, THE TASK
FORCE SHALL CONSIDER THE SIZE AND RESOURCES OF COUNTIES. THE TASK
FORCE MAY DEVELOP VARYING STANDARDS DEPENDING ON THE SIZE OF
COUNTIES.
(5) THE TASK FORCE MAY CONTINUE TO MEET AFTER JANUARY 1,
2027, AS THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR AND THE TASK FORCE DEEM
APPROPRIATE.
(6) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2028.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-8-615, amend (3);
and add (1.3) and (2)(c) as follows:
18-8-615. Retaliation against a judge, a judicial employee, or an
elected official - definitions.
(1.3) (a) AN INDIVIDUAL COMMITS RETALIATION AGAINST A JUDICIAL
EMPLOYEE IF THE INDIVIDUAL MAKES A CREDIBLE THREAT, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 18-3-602 (2)(b), OR COMMITS AN ACT OF HARASSMENT, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 18-9-111 (1), OR AN ACT OF HARM OR INJURY UPON A PERSON OR
PROPERTY AS RETALIATION OR RETRIBUTION AGAINST A JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE,
WHICH ACTION IS DIRECTED AGAINST OR COMMITTED UPON:
(I) A JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE WHO HAS PERFORMED DUTIES IN
CONNECTION WITH THE INDIVIDUAL OR A PERSON ON WHOSE BEHALF THE
INDIVIDUAL IS ACTING;
(II) A MEMBER OF THE JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE'S FAMILY;
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL IN CLOSE RELATIONSHIP TO THE JUDICIAL
EMPLOYEE; OR
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL RESIDING IN THE SAME HOUSEHOLD WITH THE
JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE.
(b) AN INDIVIDUAL COMMITS RETALIATION AGAINST A JUDICIAL
EMPLOYEE BY MEANS OF A CREDIBLE THREAT AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(1.3)(a) OF THIS SECTION IF THE INDIVIDUAL KNOWINGLY MAKES THE
CREDIBLE THREAT:
(I) DIRECTLY TO THE JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE; OR
(II) TO ANOTHER PERSON IF THE INDIVIDUAL INTENDED THAT THE
COMMUNICATION WOULD BE RELAYED TO THE JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE.
(2) (c) RETALIATION AGAINST A JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE IS A CLASS 6
FELONY.
(3) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Judge" means any justice of the supreme court, judge of the
court of appeals, district court judge, juvenile court judge, probate court
judge, water court judge, county court judge, district court magistrate,
county court magistrate, WATER COURT REFEREE, BOND HEARING OFFICER,
municipal judge, administrative law judge, or unemployment insurance
hearing officer.
(b) "JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE" MEANS A CURRENT OR FORMER EMPLOYEE
OF THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-9-313, amend
(1)(f), (1)(l), (1)(n), (2.7), and (2.8)(a); repeal (3); and add (1)(g.3),
(1)(r.5), and (2.9) as follows:
18-9-313. Personal information on the internet - victims of
domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking - other protected persons
- definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(f) "Immediate family" means a protected person's spouse, child, or
parent or any other blood relative PERSON who lives in the same residence
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

as the protected person.
(g.3) "JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE" MEANS A CURRENT OR FORMER
EMPLOYEE OF THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT.
(l) "Personal information" means the home address, home telephone
number, personal mobile telephone number, pager number, personal email
address, SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER, DRIVER'S LICENSE NUMBER, FEDERAL
TAX IDENTIFICATION NUMBER, BANK ACCOUNT NUMBER, CREDIT OR DEBIT
CARD NUMBER, or a personal photograph of a participant in the address
confidentiality program or protected person; directions to the home of a
participant in the address confidentiality program or protected person; or
photographs of the home or vehicle of a participant in the address
confidentiality program or protected person.
(n) "Protected person" means an educator, a code enforcement
officer, a human services worker, a public health worker, a child
representative, a health-care worker, a reproductive health-care services
worker, an officer or agent of the state bureau of animal protection, an
animal control officer, an office of the respondent parents' counsel staff
member or contractor, a CURRENT OR FORMER judge, A JUDICIAL EMPLOYEE,
AN ELECTED OFFICIAL, STAFF OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, a peace officer,
a prosecutor, a public defender, a public safety worker, or a firefighter.
(r.5) "STAFF OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY" MEANS A CURRENT
EMPLOYEE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2.7) (a) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly make available on
the internet personal information about a protected person or the protected
person's immediate family if the dissemination of personal information
poses an imminent and serious threat to the protected person's safety or the
safety of the protected person's immediate family and the person making the
information available on the internet knows or reasonably should know of
the imminent and serious threat.
(b) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION (2.7) IS A CLASS 1
MISDEMEANOR.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (2.7) DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO IS A
STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE WHO IS ACTING IN
PAGE 26-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

THE COURSE AND SCOPE OF THEIR DUTIES.
(2.8) (a) A protected person may submit a written request pursuant
to subsection (2.8)(b) of this section to a state or local government official
to REFRAIN FROM PUBLISHING THE PROTECTED PERSON'S PERSONAL
INFORMATION OR TO remove personal information from records that are THE
STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL MAKES available on the internet.
If a state or local government official receives the written request TO
REFRAIN FROM PUBLISHING PERSONAL INFORMATION FROM RECORDS THAT
ARE AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET, then the state or local government
official shall not knowingly make available on the internet TAKE STEPS TO
REASONABLY ENSURE THAT personal information about the protected person
or the protected person's immediate family IS NOT MADE AVAILABLE ON THE
INTERNET.
(2.9) (a) A PROTECTED PERSON MAY REQUEST THAT A PERSON WHO
IS NOT A STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL AND WHO HAS PUBLISHED
THE PROTECTED PERSON'S PERSONAL INFORMATION REMOVE THE PROTECTED
PERSON'S PERSONAL INFORMATION FROM PUBLICATION.
(b) A REQUEST MADE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2.9) MUST:
(I) BE IN WRITING;
(II) BE SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY ELECTRONIC MAIL;
(III) PROVIDE SUFFICIENT INFORMATION TO CONFIRM THAT THE
REQUESTER IS A PROTECTED PERSON; AND
(IV) ADEQUATELY IDENTIFY THE DOCUMENT, POSTING, OR OTHER
PUBLICATION CONTAINING THE PERSONAL INFORMATION.
(c) THE PERSON TO WHOM THE REQUEST IS MADE SHALL:
(I) REMOVE THE PERSONAL INFORMATION WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO
HOURS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE REQUEST; AND
(II) NOTIFY THE PROTECTED PERSON BY CERTIFIED MAIL OR BY
ELECTRONIC MAIL OF THE REMOVAL.
PAGE 27-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(d) A PROTECTED PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR A VIOLATION
OF THIS SUBSECTION (2.9) AGAINST A PERSON FOR:
(I) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(III) DAMAGES INCURRED AS THE RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBSECTION; AND
(IV) REASONABLE ATTORNEY'S FEES.
(e) IF A COURT FINDS THAT A PERSON WILLFULLY REFUSED TO
PROVIDE FOR THE REMOVAL OF PERSONAL INFORMATION KNOWING THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL ON BEHALF OF WHOM THE REQUEST WAS MADE WAS A
PROTECTED PERSON, THE COURT MAY AWARD PUNITIVE DAMAGES.
(3) A violation of subsection (2.7) of this section is a class 1
misdemeanor.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-9-313.7 as
follows:
18-9-313.7. Personal information on the internet - elected
officials - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) (I) "ELECTED OFFICIAL" MEANS THE GOVERNOR, THE LIEUTENANT
GOVERNOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE SECRETARY OF STATE, THE STATE
TREASURER, A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, A SCHOOL DISTRICT
DIRECTOR, AND AN ELECTED OR APPOINTED OFFICIAL OF A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT.
(II) "ELECTED OFFICIAL" DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
A CANDIDATE FOR THE OFFICE OF ANY ELECTED OFFICIAL.
(III) "ELECTED OFFICIAL" INCLUDES:
PAGE 28-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(A) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HOLDS AN OFFICE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION
(1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL WAS ELECTED OR
APPOINTED BY A VACANCY COMMITTEE; AND
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS HELD AN OFFICE SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN THE LAST FOUR YEARS.
(b) "EXEMPT PARTY" MEANS ANY PARTY TO THE RECORD, A
SETTLEMENT SERVICE, A TITLE INSURANCE COMPANY, A TITLE INSURANCE
AGENCY, A MORTGAGE SERVICER OR A MORTGAGE SERVICER'S QUALIFIED
AGENT, AN ATTORNEY LICENSED AND IN GOOD STANDING IN THE STATE OF
COLORADO TO PRACTICE LAW AND WHO IS ENGAGED IN A REAL ESTATE
MATTER, AND ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION AND CERTIFIES THAT THE INFORMATION WILL NOT BE USED
FOR THE PURPOSE OF HARASSMENT, INTIMIDATION, OR COMMERCIAL
PURPOSES, INCLUDING THE SALE OR RESALE OF INFORMATION.
(c) "IMMEDIATE FAMILY" MEANS:
(I) AN ELECTED OFFICIAL'S SPOUSE, CHILD, OR PARENT; OR
(II) ANY OTHER PERSON WHO LIVES IN THE SAME RESIDENCE AS THE
ELECTED OFFICIAL.
(d) "MORTGAGE SERVICER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
5-21-103 (4).
(e) "PERSONAL INFORMATION" MEANS A PERSON'S HOME ADDRESS,
HOME TELEPHONE NUMBER, PERSONAL MOBILE TELEPHONE NUMBER, PAGER
NUMBER, OR PERSONAL EMAIL ADDRESS; DIRECTIONS TO A PERSON'S HOME;
OR A PHOTOGRAPH OR DESCRIPTION OF A PERSON'S HOME, VEHICLE, OR
VEHICLE LICENSE PLATE.
(f) "SETTLEMENT SERVICE" MEANS A SERVICE LISTED IN SECTION
10-11-102 (6.7)(a) TO (6.7)(f).
(g) "TITLE INSURANCE AGENCY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 10-11-102 (8.5).
(h) "TITLE INSURANCE COMPANY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
PAGE 29-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

SECTION 10-11-102 (10).
(2) (a) IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR A PERSON TO KNOWINGLY MAKE
AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET PERSONAL INFORMATION ABOUT AN ELECTED
OFFICIAL OR AN ELECTED OFFICIAL'S IMMEDIATE FAMILY IF THE
DISSEMINATION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION POSES AN IMMINENT AND
SERIOUS THREAT TO THE SAFETY OF THE ELECTED OFFICIAL OR THE ELECTED
OFFICIAL'S IMMEDIATE FAMILY AND THE PERSON MAKING THE INFORMATION
AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW OF
THE IMMINENT AND SERIOUS THREAT.
(b) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION (2) IS A CLASS 1
MISDEMEANOR; EXCEPT THAT THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b) DOES NOT APPLY TO
A PERSON WHO IS A STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL WHO IS ACTING
IN THE COURSE AND SCOPE OF THEIR DUTIES.
(3) (a) AN ELECTED OFFICIAL MAY SUBMIT A WRITTEN REQUEST
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(b) OF THIS SECTION TO A STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL TO REDACT THE ELECTED OFFICIAL'S PERSONAL
INFORMATION FROM RECORDS THAT THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT
OFFICIAL MAKES AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET. IF A STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL RECEIVES THE WRITTEN REQUEST, THE STATE OR
LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL SHALL NOT KNOWINGLY MAKE AVAILABLE ON
THE INTERNET PERSONAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE ELECTED OFFICIAL.
(b) AN ELECTED OFFICIAL'S WRITTEN REQUEST TO A STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL TO REDACT PERSONAL INFORMATION FROM RECORDS
THAT THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL MAKES AVAILABLE ON
THE INTERNET MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE ELECTED OFFICIAL'S FULL NAME AND HOME ADDRESS;
(II) THE SPECIFIC PERSONAL INFORMATION THAT THE ELECTED
OFFICIAL IS REQUESTING BE REDACTED AND THE LOCATION OF THE RECORDS
THAT INCLUDE THE PERSONAL INFORMATION;
(III) EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON SUBMITTING THE REQUEST IS AN
ELECTED OFFICIAL; AND
(IV) AN AFFIRMATION STATING THAT THE ELECTED OFFICIAL
PAGE 30-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

SUBMITTING THE REQUEST HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT THE
DISSEMINATION OF THE PERSONAL INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE
RECORDS THAT THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL MAKES
AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET POSES AN IMMINENT AND SERIOUS THREAT TO
THE SAFETY OF THE ELECTED OFFICIAL.
(c) AN EXEMPT PARTY MAY ACCESS A RECORD THAT INCLUDES
INFORMATION OTHERWISE SUBJECT TO REDACTION PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3) AND THAT IS MAINTAINED BY A STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL IF THE PERSON SEEKING ACCESS TO THE RECORD
PROVIDES EVIDENCE AND AN AFFIRMATION UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY
THAT THEY ARE AN EXEMPT PARTY.
(d) EACH STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL SHALL GRANT AN
EXEMPT PARTY ACCESS TO THE RECORD BASED ON EXISTING PROCESSES OR
SHALL ADOPT A PROCESS TO GRANT ACCESS IF ONE IS NOT ALREADY IN
PLACE. EACH STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL MAY ASSESS
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS RELATED TO GRANTING ACCESS TO THE EXEMPT
PARTY REQUESTING THE RECORD.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-32-101, amend
(1), (5)(b) introductory portion, (5)(b)(II), (5)(g.5), (5)(h.5), (5)(i)
introductory portion, (5)(i)(II), (5)(j) introductory portion, (5)(j)(II), (5)(k)
introductory portion, (5)(k)(II), (5)(l) introductory portion, (5)(l)(II), (5)(m)
introductory portion, (5)(m)(II), (5)(n) introductory portion, (5)(n)(II),
(5)(o)(II), (5)(p) introductory portion, (5)(p)(II), (5)(q)(II), (5)(r)
introductory portion, and (5)(r)(II); repeal (5)(a)(IV); and add (10) as
follows:
13-32-101. Docket fees in civil actions - judicial stabilization cash
fund - justice center cash fund - justice center maintenance fund - equal
justice fee collection - court security surcharge collection - created -
report - legislative declaration.
(1) At the time of first appearance in all civil actions and special
proceedings in all courts of record, except in the supreme court and the
court of appeals, and except in the probate proceedings in the district court
or probate court of the city and county of Denver, and except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section and in sections 13-32-103 and 13-32-104,
there shall be paid in advance the total docket fees, as follows:
PAGE 31-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(a) On and after July 1, 2009 JULY 1, 2027, by the petitioner in a
proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or declaration of
invalidity of marriage and by the petitioner in an action for a declaratory
judgment concerning the status of marriage, a fee of two hundred thirty
TWENTY-FIVE dollars;
(a.5) On and after October 1, 2013 JULY 1, 2027, by the petitioner
in a proceeding for dissolution of a civil union, legal separation of a civil
union, or declaration of invalidity of a civil union and by the petitioner in
an action for a declaratory judgment concerning the status of a civil union,
a fee of two hundred thirty TWENTY-FIVE dollars;
(b) On and after July 1, 2009 JULY 1, 2027, by the respondent in a
proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or declaration of
invalidity of marriage and by the respondent to an action for a declaratory
judgment concerning the status of marriage, a fee of one hundred sixteen
ELEVEN dollars;
(b.5) On and after October 1, 2013 JULY 1, 2027, by the respondent
in a proceeding for dissolution of a civil union, legal separation of a civil
union, or declaration of invalidity of a civil union and by the respondent to
an action for a declaratory judgment concerning the status of a civil union,
a fee of one hundred sixteen ELEVEN dollars;
(c) (I) to (III) Repealed.
(III.5) Except as provided in subsections (1)(c)(IV) and (1)(c)(V) of
this section:
(A) On or after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, by each plaintiff,
petitioner, third-party plaintiff, and party filing a cross claim or
counterclaim, when a money judgment sought is less than one thousand
dollars and such action is commenced in a court of record of appropriate
limited jurisdiction, a fee in the amount of eighty-five EIGHTY dollars.
(B) On or after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, by each defendant,
respondent, third-party defendant, or other party in such court not filing a
cross claim or counterclaim, when a money judgment sought is less than
one thousand dollars and such action is commenced in a court of record of
appropriate limited jurisdiction, a fee in the amount of eighty SEVENTY-FIVE
PAGE 32-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

dollars.
(C) On or after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, by each plaintiff,
petitioner, third-party plaintiff, and party filing a cross claim or
counterclaim, when a money judgment sought is one thousand dollars or
more but less than fifteen thousand dollars and such action is commenced
in a court of record of appropriate limited jurisdiction, a fee in the amount
of one hundred five dollars.
(D) On or after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, by each defendant,
respondent, third-party defendant, or other party in such court not filing a
cross claim or counterclaim, when a money judgment sought is one
thousand dollars or more but less than fifteen thousand dollars and such
action is commenced in a court of record of appropriate limited jurisdiction,
a fee in the amount of one hundred NINETY-FIVE dollars.
(E) On or after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, by each plaintiff,
petitioner, third-party plaintiff, and party filing a cross claim or
counterclaim, when a money judgment sought is fifteen thousand dollars or
more but does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars and such action is
commenced in a court of record of appropriate limited jurisdiction, a fee in
the amount of one hundred thirty-five THIRTY dollars.
(F) On or after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, by each defendant,
respondent, third-party defendant, or other party in such court not filing a
cross claim or counterclaim, when a money judgment sought is fifteen
thousand dollars or more but does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars
and such action is commenced in a court of record of appropriate limited
jurisdiction, a fee in the amount of one hundred thirty TWENTY-FIVE dollars.
(IV) The general assembly hereby declares that docket fees for
actions filed in the small claims division of the county court should reflect
the range of the monetary jurisdictional limit established for such THE
actions and that such THE fees should promote access to the courts and
reflect appropriate contributions from litigants using the court system based
on the money judgment sought in an action. The general assembly hereby
declares that it is appropriate to establish docket fees for the small claims
division of the county court as follows:
(A) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, when the money
PAGE 33-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

judgment sought by the plaintiff in an action filed in the small claims
division of the county court is five hundred dollars or less, a plaintiff shall
pay a fee of thirty-one TWENTY-SIX dollars.
(B) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, when the money
judgment sought by the plaintiff in an action filed in the small claims
division of the county court is five hundred dollars or less, a defendant
filing an answer without a counterclaim in such an action shall pay a fee of
twenty-six TWENTY-ONE dollars.
(C) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, when the money
judgment sought in an action filed in the small claims division of the county
court exceeds five hundred dollars and is no more than seven thousand five
hundred dollars, a plaintiff shall pay a fee of fifty-five FIFTY dollars.
(D) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, when the money
judgment sought in an action filed in the small claims division of the county
court exceeds five hundred dollars and is no more than seven thousand five
hundred dollars, a defendant filing an answer without a counterclaim in
such an action shall pay a fee of forty-one THIRTY-SIX dollars.
(E) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, if a defendant files an
answer with a counterclaim in an action in the small claims division of the
county court and the amount sought in the action and amount sought in the
counterclaim are each five hundred dollars or less, the fee for such answer
and counterclaim shall be thirty-one TWENTY-SIX dollars.
(F) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, if a defendant files an
answer with a counterclaim in an action in the small claims division of the
county court and the amount sought in either the action or the counterclaim
is more than five hundred dollars and is not more than seven thousand five
hundred dollars, the fee for such answer and counterclaim shall be forty-six
FORTY-ONE dollars.
(V) A defendant or third-party defendant shall not be charged any
fee, charge, or cost for filing an answer in response to a forcible entry and
detainer complaint, regardless of whether the filing of the answer includes
a counterclaim or cross claim, and regardless of whether a money judgment
is being sought for any amount.
PAGE 34-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(d) On and after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, by each plaintiff,
petitioner, third-party plaintiff, and party filing a cross claim or
counterclaim filed in a district court of the state, a fee of two hundred
thirty-five THIRTY dollars;
(e) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, by each appellant, a fee
of one hundred sixty-three FIFTY-EIGHT dollars;
(f) On and after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, by an appellee and
by each defendant or respondent not filing a cross claim or counterclaim, a
fee of one hundred ninety-two EIGHTY-SEVEN dollars;
(g) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, by a petitioner in
adoption proceedings, a fee of one hundred sixty-seven SIXTY-TWO dollars.
(5) (a) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(a) or (1)(a.5)
of this section must be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as
follows:
(IV) Five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204;
(b) Each fee collected pursuant to paragraph (b) or (b.5) of
subsection (1) SUBSECTION (1)(b) OR (1)(b.5) of this section shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, seventy-five dollars
shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
subsection (6) of this section, five dollars shall be deposited in the court
security cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, twenty-six
dollars shall be deposited in the justice center cash fund created in
paragraph (a) of subsection (7) SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section, five
dollars shall be deposited in the Colorado domestic abuse program fund
created in section 39-22-802 (1), C.R.S., and five dollars shall be deposited
in the family violence justice fund created in section 14-4-107 (1). C.R.S.
(g.5) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(III.5)(A),
(1)(c)(III.5)(C), or (1)(c)(III.5)(E) of this section shall be transmitted to the
state treasurer and five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash
fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, thirty-eight dollars shall be
PAGE 35-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

deposited in the justice center cash fund created in subsection (7)(a) of this
section, and one dollar shall be deposited in the general fund pursuant to
section 2-5-119. The remaining balance shall be deposited in the judicial
stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6) of this section.
(h.5) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(III.5)(B),
(1)(c)(III.5)(D), or (1)(c)(III.5)(F) of this section shall be transmitted to the
state treasurer and five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash
fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and thirty-eight dollars shall
be deposited in the justice center cash fund created in subsection (7)(a) of
this section. The remaining balance shall be deposited in the judicial
stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6) of this section.
(i) Each fee collected pursuant to sub-subparagraph (A) of
subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION
(1)(c)(IV)(A) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and
divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, fourteen dollars shall be
deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6) of
this section, five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, eleven dollars shall be deposited
in the justice center cash fund created in paragraph (a) of subsection (7)
SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section, and one dollar shall be deposited in the
general fund pursuant to section 2-5-119. C.R.S.
(j) Each fee collected pursuant to sub-subparagraph (B) of
subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION
(1)(c)(IV)(B) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and
divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, ten dollars shall be
deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6) of
this section five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and eleven dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in paragraph (a) of
subsection (7) SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section.
(k) Each fee collected pursuant to sub-subparagraph (C) of
subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION
PAGE 36-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(1)(c)(IV)(C) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and
divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, thirty-eight dollars shall
be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6)
of this section, five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, eleven dollars shall be deposited
in the justice center cash fund created in paragraph (a) of subsection (7)
SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section, and one dollar shall be deposited in the
general fund pursuant to section 2-5-119. C.R.S.
(l) Each fee collected pursuant to sub-subparagraph (D) of
subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION
(1)(c)(IV)(D) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and
divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, twenty-five dollars shall
be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6)
of this section five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and eleven dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in paragraph (a) of
subsection (7) SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section.
(m) Each fee collected pursuant to sub-subparagraph (E) of
subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION
(1)(c)(IV)(E) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and
divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, fifteen dollars shall be
deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6) of
this section five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and eleven dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in paragraph (a) of
subsection (7) SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section.
(n) Each fee collected pursuant to sub-subparagraph (F) of
subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION
(1)(c)(IV)(F) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and
divided as follows:
PAGE 37-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, thirty dollars shall be
deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6) of
this section five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and eleven dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in paragraph (a) of
subsection (7) SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section.
(o) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred
sixty-one dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund
created in subsection (6) of this section, five dollars shall be deposited in
the court security cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204,
sixty-eight dollars shall be deposited in the justice center cash fund created
in subsection (7)(a) of this section, and one dollar shall be deposited in the
general fund pursuant to section 2-5-119.
(p) Each fee collected pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection (1)
SUBSECTION (1)(e) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer
and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, ninety dollars shall be
deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in subsection (6) of
this section five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and sixty-eight dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in paragraph (a) of
subsection (7) SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section.
(q) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(f) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after January 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred
nineteen dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund
created in subsection (6) of this section five dollars shall be deposited in the
court security cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and
sixty-eight dollars shall be deposited in the justice center cash fund created
in subsection (7)(a) of this section.
(r) Each fee collected pursuant to paragraph (g) of subsection (1)
PAGE 38-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

SUBSECTION (1)(g) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer
and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred forty-three
dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
subsection (6) of this section, five dollars shall be deposited in the court
security cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, fifteen dollars
shall be deposited in the justice center cash fund created in paragraph (a) of
subsection (7) SUBSECTION (7)(a) of this section, one dollar shall be
deposited in the general fund pursuant to section 2-5-119, C.R.S., and three
dollars shall be deposited in the vital statistics records cash fund created in
section 25-2-121. C.R.S.
(10) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE COURT SHALL COLLECT, ON
BEHALF OF THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY, THE COURT SECURITY
SURCHARGE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-1-505 ON FILINGS SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IN THE AMOUNT OF TEN DOLLARS ON CIVIL
ACTIONS FILED IN DISTRICT COURT AND TEN DOLLARS ON CIVIL ACTIONS
FILED IN COUNTY COURT. THE COURT SHALL TRANSMIT THE COURT SECURITY
SURCHARGE IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN SECTION 13-1-505 (2).
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-32-102, amend
(1), (6)(a)(II), (6)(b)(II), (6)(c)(II), (6)(d)(II), (6)(e)(II), (6)(f)(II), (6)(g)(II),
and (6)(h)(II); and add (8) as follows:
13-32-102. Fees in probate proceedings - equal justice fee
collection - court security surcharge collection.
(1) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, for services rendered by
judges and clerks of district or probate courts in all counties of the state of
Colorado in proceedings had pursuant to articles 10 to 17 of title 15, the
court shall charge the following fees:
(a) Docket fee at the time of filing first papers in any decedent's
estate eligible for summary administrative procedures under section
15-12-1203, or in any small estate of a person under disability qualifying
under section 15-14-118, which estates involve no real property. . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 83.00 $ 78.00
(b) Docket fee at time of filing first papers in any estate not coming
PAGE 39-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

within the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section. . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 199.00 194.00
(c) Additional fee payable by petitioner at time of filing petition for
supervised administration of a decedent's estate pursuant to sections
15-12-501 and 15-12-502, except for contested claims . . . 198.00 193.00
(d) Docket fee to be paid by the claimant prior to hearing on any
contested claim, which fee is taxed by the district or probate court in the
same manner as costs in civil actions . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 198.00 193.00
(e) Registration fee for registration of trust pursuant to article 5 of
title 15. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 198.00 193.00
(f) Docket fee at time of filing first papers in each action relating to
a trust. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 199.00 194.00
(g) Nonrefundable fee for any demand for notice filed pursuant to
section 15-12-204 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 36.00 31.00
(h) A fee to be paid by the testator at the time of depositing a will
with the court during the testator's lifetime pursuant to section 15-11-515
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 18.00 13.00
(6) (a) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this
section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, forty-eight dollars shall
be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section
13-32-101 (6), five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, fifteen dollars shall be deposited
in the office of public guardianship cash fund established pursuant to
section 13-94-108 (1), and fifteen dollars shall be deposited in the justice
center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
(b) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred forty-three
dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
PAGE 40-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

section 13-32-101 (6), five dollars shall be deposited in the court security
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, fifteen dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a),
thirty-five dollars shall be deposited in the office of public guardianship
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-94-108 (1), and one dollar shall
be deposited in the general fund pursuant to section 2-5-119.
(c) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred forty-three
dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
section 13-32-101 (6), five dollars shall be deposited in the court security
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, thirty-five dollars shall
be deposited in the office of public guardianship cash fund established
pursuant to section 13-94-108 (1), and fifteen dollars shall be deposited in
the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
(d) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred forty-three
dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
section 13-32-101 (6), five dollars shall be deposited in the court security
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, thirty-five dollars shall
be deposited in the office of public guardianship cash fund established
pursuant to section 13-94-108 (1), and fifteen dollars shall be deposited in
the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
(e) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(e) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred forty-three
dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
section 13-32-101 (6), five dollars shall be deposited in the court security
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, thirty-five dollars shall
be deposited in the office of public guardianship cash fund established
pursuant to section 13-94-108 (1), and fifteen dollars shall be deposited in
the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
PAGE 41-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(f) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(f) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred forty-three
dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
section 13-32-101 (6), five dollars shall be deposited in the court security
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, fifteen dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a),
thirty-five dollars shall be deposited in the office of public guardianship
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-94-108 (1), and one dollar shall
be deposited in the general fund pursuant to section 2-5-119.
(g) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(g) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, twenty-five dollars shall
be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section
13-32-101 (6) AND six dollars shall be deposited in the office of public
guardianship cash fund established pursuant to section 13-94-108 (1). and
five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund established
pursuant to section 13-1-204.
(h) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(h) of this section
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, ten dollars shall be
deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section 13-32-101
(6) AND three dollars shall be deposited in the office of public guardianship
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-94-108 (1). and five dollars
shall be deposited in the court security cash fund established pursuant to
section 13-1-204.
(8) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE COURT SHALL COLLECT, ON
BEHALF OF THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY, THE COURT SECURITY
SURCHARGE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-1-505 ON EACH FILING SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IN THE AMOUNT OF TEN DOLLARS. THE
COURT SHALL TRANSMIT THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE IN THE MANNER
SPECIFIED IN SECTION 13-1-505 (2).
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-32-103, amend
PAGE 42-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(1)(a), (1)(b) introductory portion, (1)(b)(II), (2)(a), (2)(b) introductory
portion, (2)(b)(II), (3)(a), (3)(b) introductory portion, (3)(b)(II), (5), (6)(a),
(6)(b) introductory portion, and (6)(b)(II); and add (8) as follows:
13-32-103. Docket fees in special proceedings.
(1) (a) On and after July 1, 2008, If an appeal is taken from a
judgment of a county court in a criminal matter or from a judgment of a
municipal court, the appellant shall pay a docket fee of seventy SIXTY-FIVE
dollars. Such an THE appeal shall not be IS NOT subject to the tax imposed
by section 2-5-119, C.R.S., for the use of the committee on legal services.
(b) Each fee collected pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection
(1) SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, forty-five dollars shall
be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section
13-32-101 (6) five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and twenty dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
(2) (a) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, in cases where a
motion to dismiss for failure to file a complaint is filed, the defendant shall
pay a docket fee of fifty-five FIFTY dollars.
(b) Each fee collected pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection
(2) SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, thirty dollars shall be
deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section 13-32-101
(6) five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund established
pursuant to section 13-1-204, and twenty dollars shall be deposited in the
justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
(3) (a) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, in cases where a
motion to authorize a sale in accordance with the provisions of rule 120,
Colorado rules of civil procedure, is filed, the applicant shall pay a docket
fee of two hundred twenty-four NINETEEN dollars.
PAGE 43-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

(b) Each fee collected pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection
(3) SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred fifty dollars
shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section
13-32-101 (6), five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, sixty-eight dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a),
and one dollar shall be deposited in the general fund pursuant to section
2-5-119. C.R.S.
(5) In cases of domestic abuse pursuant to article 4 of title 14,
C.R.S., the plaintiff shall not be required to pay the docket fee set forth in
section 13-32-101 OR THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 13-1-505. At the first hearing held in connection with the action,
the court shall set a date for payment of the docket fee AND SURCHARGE
unless the court determines that the plaintiff is unable to pay the docket fee
AND SURCHARGE pursuant to section 13-16-103.
(6) (a) On and after July 1, 2008, In any supplemental proceeding
held pursuant to rule 69, Colorado rules of civil procedure, or rule 369,
Colorado rules of county court civil procedure, the judgment creditor, upon
commencement of the proceeding, shall pay a docket fee of seventy
SIXTY-FIVE dollars.
(b) Each fee collected pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection
(6) SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2010 JULY 1, 2027, forty-five dollars shall
be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section
13-32-101 (6) five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and twenty dollars shall be
deposited in the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
(8) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE COURT SHALL COLLECT, ON
BEHALF OF THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY, THE COURT SECURITY
SURCHARGE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-1-505 ON EACH FILING SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTIONS (1), (2), (3), AND (6) OF THIS SECTION IN THE AMOUNT OF TEN
PAGE 44-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

DOLLARS. THE COURT SHALL TRANSMIT THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE
IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN SECTION 13-1-505 (2).
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-32-105, amend (3)
as follows:
13-32-105. Docket fees in criminal actions.
(3) Pursuant to section 13-1-204 (1)(b), a five-dollar surcharge shall
be assessed and collected on each docket fee described in this section
concerning criminal convictions entered on and after July 1, 2007
BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE COURT SHALL COLLECT, ON BEHALF OF THE
COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY, THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE DESCRIBED
IN SECTION 13-1-505 ON EACH DOCKET FEE SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION IN THE
AMOUNT OF TEN DOLLARS. THE COURT SHALL TRANSMIT THE COURT
SECURITY SURCHARGE IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN SECTION 13-1-505 (2).
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-71-144, amend
(1)(a), (1)(b), (2)(a)(II), (2)(b) introductory portion, and (2)(b)(II); and add
(4) as follows:
13-71-144. Jury fees to be assessed in civil cases.
(1) (a) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, any party demanding
a trial by jury as provided by statute shall pay to the clerk of the court a fee
of two hundred thirty-one TWENTY-SIX dollars in district court cases at the
time the demand is made pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure.
(b) On and after July 1, 2008 JULY 1, 2027, any party demanding a
trial by jury as provided by statute shall pay to the clerk of the court a fee
of ninety-eight NINETY-THREE dollars in county court cases at the time the
demand is made pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure.
(2) (a) Each fee collected pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this
section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2019 JULY 1, 2027, one hundred sixty-five
dollars shall be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in
section 13-32-101 (6), five dollars shall be deposited in the court security
cash fund established pursuant to section 13-1-204, forty-one dollars shall
PAGE 45-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

be deposited in the office of public guardianship cash fund established
pursuant to section 13-94-108 (1), and twenty dollars shall be deposited in
the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
(b) Each fee collected pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1)
SUBSECTION (1)(b) of this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer
and divided as follows:
(II) On and after July 1, 2009 JULY 1, 2027, eighty-four dollars shall
be deposited in the judicial stabilization cash fund created in section
13-32-101 (6) five dollars shall be deposited in the court security cash fund
established pursuant to section 13-1-204, and nine dollars shall be deposited
in the justice center cash fund created in section 13-32-101 (7)(a).
(4) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE COURT SHALL COLLECT, ON
BEHALF OF THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY, THE COURT SECURITY
SURCHARGE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-1-505 ON EACH FILING SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IN THE AMOUNT OF TEN DOLLARS. THE
COURT SHALL TRANSMIT THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE IN THE MANNER
SPECIFIED IN SECTION 13-1-505 (2).
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-2.3-102, amend
(3) as follows:
16-2.3-102. Penalty assessment notice for civil infractions.
(3) (a) If a person charged with a civil infraction fails to pay the fine
and surcharges within twenty days after the date of the penalty assessment
notice, or if the clerk of the court does not accept payment for the fine and
surcharges as evidenced by receipt, the person is allowed to pay the fine,
surcharges, and the docket fees in the amounts set forth in sections 13-1-204
(1)(b) SECTIONS 13-1-505 (1)(a) and 16-2.3-106 (5)(a)(I) to the clerk of the
court referred to in the summons portion of the penalty assessment notice
during the two business days prior to the time for appearance, as specified
in the notice. If the fine for a civil infraction and surcharges is not timely
paid, the case is heard in the court of competent jurisdiction prescribed on
the penalty assessment notice in the manner provided for in this article 2.3
for the prosecution of civil infractions.
(b) THE COURT SHALL COLLECT, ON BEHALF OF THE COURT SECURITY
PAGE 46-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

AUTHORITY, THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE DESCRIBED IN SECTION
13-1-505 AND REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
THE COURT SHALL TRANSMIT THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE IN THE
MANNER SPECIFIED IN SECTION 13-1-505 (2).
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1710, amend
(4)(a.5) as follows:
42-4-1710. Failure to pay penalty for traffic infractions - failure
of parent or guardian to sign penalty assessment notice - procedures -
repeal.
(4) (a.5) (I) (A) Pursuant to section 13-1-204 (1)(b), C.R.S., a
five-dollar surcharge, in addition to the original surcharge described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
shall be assessed and collected on each docket fee that is described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) concerning penalties assessed on and
after July 1, 2007 SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(a.5)(I) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30,
2027.
(II) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE COURT SHALL COLLECT, ON
BEHALF OF THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY, THE COURT SECURITY
SURCHARGE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-1-505 ON EACH DOCKET FEE
SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION IN THE AMOUNT OF TEN
DOLLARS. THE COURT SHALL TRANSMIT THE COURT SECURITY SURCHARGE
IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN SECTION 13-1-505 (2).
SECTION 26. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-406, amend (1)
as follows:
2-2-406. Contempt of either house.
(1) The senate and the house of representatives may each punish by
imprisonment not extending beyond the same session of the general
assembly, as and for a contempt, disorderly conduct of its members,
officers, employees, or others committed in the immediate view of the
senate or the house of representatives and tending to interrupt its
proceedings. Imprisonment for contempt shall be effected by a warrant in
PAGE 47-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

the name of the people of the state, signed by the presiding officer of the
house in which the contempt occurred, directed to the chief security officer
SERGEANTS AT ARMS of such house or the state police and ordering the
apprehension of the contemnor and the delivery of him THE CONTEMNOR to
the sheriff of the county in which the alleged contempt occurred for
detention by said THE sheriff in accordance with such THE warrant, subject
to such bail as may be set by the district court of the county in which the
alleged contempt occurred. A finding of contempt and imprisonment
therefor shall DOES not constitute a bar to any other proceeding, civil or
criminal, for the same act.
SECTION 27. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-30-1104, amend
(4) as follows:
24-30-1104. Functions of the department - definitions - rules.
(4) In addition to any other duties imposed by this section, the
department of personnel shall establish and maintain a program for parking
permits and building and grounds maintenance for the state capitol
buildings group COMPLEX pursuant to part 1 of article 82 of this title TITLE
24.
SECTION 28. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-70-207 as
follows:
24-70-207. Delivery of sealed bids.
All bids and proposals shall be delivered at the office of the
executive director of the department of personnel, in the state capitol
buildings group COMPLEX, endorsed, "Proposals for state printing; Class
........", and shall be and remain sealed until the hour specified in the
advertisements or call for the opening of such bids and proposals, and in no
case shall bids be received by the executive director of the department of
personnel after such hour, except for bids of state institutions.
SECTION 29. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-77-102, amend
(15)(b)(XXI) and (15)(b)(XXII); and add (15)(b)(XXIV) as follows:
24-77-102. Definitions.
PAGE 48-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

As used in this article 77, unless the context otherwise requires:
(15) (b) "Special purpose authority" includes, but is not limited to:
(XXI) The equal justice authority created in section 13-5.7-202; and
(XXII) The building urgent infrastructure and leveraging dollars
authority created in section 24-117-104 (1); AND
(XXIV) THE COURT SECURITY AUTHORITY CREATED IN SECTION
13-1-502.
SECTION 30. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-82-101, amend (2)
as follows:
24-82-101. Control of legislative space in the capitol, the
legislative services building, and the state office building at 1525
Sherman street - responsibility of department of personnel for
supervision of maintenance in capitol buildings group - exception -
capitol complex master plan.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 2-2-321, C.R.S., the
department of personnel shall have HAS control of executive space in the
capitol and the grounds and any other property the state may acquire
adjacent to the capitol other than the grounds and tunnels specified in
paragraph (a) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION (1)(a) of this section, together
with all furniture, fixtures, furnishings, and equipment and all exhibits
placed in and about such space or property, subject to appropriations made
by the general assembly and subject to the provisions of section 24-82-108,
concerning preservation of the state capitol building. Except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION (1)(b) of this
section, the department of personnel shall be IS responsible for the
supervision of the provision of maintenance for the state capitol buildings
group COMPLEX, including assignment of all executive space owned and
rented in the capitol buildings group, subject to appropriations made by the
general assembly and subject to the provisions of section 2-2-321, C.R.S.,
concerning space for the legislative department, and subject to the
provisions of section 24-82-108, concerning preservation of the state capitol
building.
PAGE 49-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

SECTION 31. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-1-107, amend (1)
as follows:
35-1-107. Commissioner of agriculture - report - publications -
deputy commissioner - rules.
(1) The commissioner of agriculture shall be IS the chief
administrative officer of the department of agriculture and shall have HAS
direct control and management of its functions, subject only to the powers
and duties of the commission as prescribed in this article ARTICLE 1. The
commissioner shall be IS appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate, and shall serve SERVES at the pleasure of the governor. The
commissioner shall be IS allowed traveling and subsistence expenses
actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties. The
commissioner shall maintain an office at the state capitol buildings group
COMPLEX and shall be IS custodian of all property and records of the
department.
SECTION 32. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that sections 19 to 24 of this act take effect July 1, 2027.
SECTION 33. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 50-HOUSE BILL 26-1422

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 51-HOUSE BILL 26-1422